Hawaii statutes.
§438-7 Applications. (a) Each person
who desires to practice as a barber or as a barber apprentice or to operate a
barber shop shall first file with the board a written application on a form
prescribed and supplied by the board, deposit with the board the required fees,
and satisfy the applicable qualification requirements specified in this
section.

(b) An applicant for a barber's license shall:

(1) Be at least seventeen years of age;

(2) Have a total of fifteen hundred clock hours of
barber training through the following or a combination thereof:

(A) As a barber apprentice, holding a barber
apprentice permit; or

(B) As a student enrolled in a school that
has a barbering curriculum; provided that only classes related to barbering
shall be applied towards the accumulation of clock hours;

the board shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to implement this paragraph; and

(3) Take and pass an examination for licensure.

(c) An applicant for a barber apprentice
permit shall:

(1) Be at least seventeen years of age; and

(2) Provide proof that the applicant will be training
in a licensed barber shop, or beauty shop under supervision of a licensed
barber, or licensed beauty operator with hairdresser qualifications.

(d) An applicant for a barber shop license
shall:

(1) Meet the standards of sanitation required by the
department of health and as prescribed by the rules of the board;

(2) Identify at least one licensed barber at the
barber shop to qualify the barber shop for licensure;

(3) Identify the owner of the barber shop who shall
be responsible for all operations of the barber shop and who shall ensure that
only currently licensed barbers, barber apprentice permittees, barber temporary
permittees, or beauty operators, beauty operator temporary permittees, or
beauty operator apprentice permittees practice in the barber shop;

(4) Identify the name and location of the barber
shop;

(5) Demonstrate that the applicant has adequate
equipment and facilities for the practice of barbering as prescribed by the
rules of the board; and

(6) Provide a statement that the applicant shall
allow only qualified licensees who have at least one year's experience to train
apprentices as prescribed by the rules of the board.

(e) Any barber applicant who has not obtained
licensure after four consecutive examinations offered by the board shall be
required to apply and train as an apprentice barber for six months before
qualifying for another series of examinations.

(f) Any transfer of ownership of a barber
shop, change in a barber shop name, or relocation of a barber shop shall
require the filing of a new application for licensure together with the
required fees.

(g) The board, as prescribed by rules, may
recognize training obtained under a licensed beauty operator with hairdresser
qualifications to fulfill the barber training requirement. [L 1947, c 194, §7;
RL 1955, §58-7; HRS §438-7; am L 1983, c 240, §4; am L 1986, c 138, §3; am L
1987, c 246, §5; am L 1993, c 264, §4; am L 1994, c 124, §2; am L 1997, c 40,
§3 and c 87, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next